North Carolina, session 2025, HB1142.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. EXPAND ACCESS TO GRADE SCHOOL CLASSES THAT PREPARE
STUDENTS FOR QUANTUM COMPUTING
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction (Department) the sum of two million six hundred thousand dollars
($2,600,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the development, expansion,
or continuation of science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM) education programs that
assist students in developing the academic background necessary to later pursue apprenticeships,
internships, degree programs, or employment in quantum computing. The funds shall be
allocated as follows:
(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to be divided equally among all public
school units located within the geographical boundaries of any local school
administrative unit that contains any portion of a military base or installation.
(2) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to Durham Public Schools.
(3) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to Orange County Schools.
*H1142-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to Wake County Schools.
SECTION 1.(b) The funds allocated pursuant to this section may be used for any of
the following:
(1) Hiring or providing stipends to STEM teachers. Public school units are
encouraged to prioritize hiring or providing stipends to teachers at the high
school level with interest or background in quantum computing, physics,
computing, or cryptography.
(2) Develop, expand, or continue collaborative or experiential learning
opportunities where students work with businesses, nonprofits, or higher
education institutions.
(3) Specialized summer STEM programs that include lab research or applied
learning.
SECTION 1.(c) No later than April 1, 2027, the Department shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee the following information:
(1) A description of the classes or learning opportunities offered with funds
allocated pursuant to this section.
(2) A detailed description of how funds were spent.
(3) The number of students that participated in the classes or learning
opportunities offered as a result of the funding provided by this section.
(4) Any increases in student performance or outcomes in STEM programs.
(5) Any other information the Department deems relevant to evaluating the
effectiveness of funding allocated pursuant to this section.
SECTION 1.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART II. QUANTUM COMPUTING GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 2.(a) Program; Purpose. – There is established the Quantum Computing
Grant Program (Program) to be administered by the North Carolina Collaboratory for the
2026-2027 academic year. The purpose of the Program shall be to provide opportunities for high
school students in North Carolina public school units and Department of Defense schools to work
with institutions of higher education on current issues in quantum computing and other emerging
technologies, including educational programming, interactive and applied learning opportunities,
and research.
SECTION 2.(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(1) Collaboratory. – The North Carolina Collaboratory.
(2) Eligible high school. – A school providing secondary instruction that meets
one of the following requirements:
a. Is located in a public school unit.
b. Is a Department of Defense school located in North Carolina.
(3) Eligible institution of higher education. – An institution of higher education
that does both of the following:
a. Has demonstrated the ability to collaborate with public school units
located near the Research Triangle region of the State, including
Chapel Hill Carrboro City Schools, Cumberland County Schools,
Durham Public Schools, Wake County Schools, and Orange County
Schools.
b. Has a formal partnership with the United States Department of
Defense related to research or workforce development.
(4) Institution of higher education. – A constituent institution of The University
of North Carolina, a community college located in this State, or an eligible
private postsecondary institution as defined in G.S. 116-280(3).
Page 2 House Bill 1142-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(c) Eligibility; Applications. – Any eligible institution of higher
education may apply to the Collaboratory for a grant to develop an educational program with an
eligible high school in the 2026-2027 academic year to facilitate student engagement with
quantum computing and other emerging technologies. Grants may be awarded to eligible
institutions of higher education in amounts of up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per eligible
institution of higher education.
SECTION 2.(d) Use of Funds. – Funds awarded to an eligible institution of higher
education pursuant to the Program shall be used to provide opportunities for high school students
to gain hands-on experience, mentorship, and exposure to career pathways in science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics that are related to current issues in quantum
computing and related emerging technologies. Permissible uses of these funds include student
stipends, program administration, mentorship, and research participation costs related to any of
the following:
(1) Internships, especially mentored research internships aligned with
Department of Defense initiatives.
(2) Research assistant positions or applied research opportunities, including
research connected to workforce development and innovation priorities in the
State.
(3) Laboratory-based research, especially as related to defense technology or
cybersecurity.
SECTION 2.(e) Report. – No later than February 15, 2027, the Collaboratory shall
report the following information to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the
Fiscal Research Division:
(1) Number and amounts of grants awarded.
(2) Identities of the institutions of higher education receiving grants.
(3) Identities of public school units and Department of Defense schools working
with institutions of higher education receiving grants.
(4) Identities of institutions of higher education that applied for grants but did not
receive one.
(5) The impact of the Program on student success.
SECTION 2.(f) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the North
Carolina Collaboratory to award grants pursuant to the Quantum Computing Grant Program
established pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2.(g) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART III. INCOME TAX CREDIT FOR CERTAIN BUSINESSES
SECTION 3.(a) Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-153.12. Tax credit for eligible businesses.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Eligible business. – A business that (i) is in the defense, technology,
computing, cybersecurity, or quantum sector, or that has a service line in
quantum computing, (ii) is subject to income tax under this Article, and (iii)
has eligible expenses.
(2) Eligible expenses. – Costs invested by an eligible business into collaborative
or experiential learning opportunities with North Carolina high school
students, during the school year or through summer programs, that:
a. Comply with all relevant State and federal nondiscrimination laws.
House Bill 1142-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Offer high school students the opportunity to utilize lab space,
computing power, or incorporate expertise and resources not typically
available to high school students into an applied learning project that
will either (i) increase student interest in quantum computing careers
or (ii) better prepare students to succeed in a quantum computing
program or quantum computing career after graduating high school.
(b) Credit. – A taxpayer that is an eligible business is allowed a credit against the tax
imposed by this Part in an amount equal to the taxpayer's eligible expenses, not to exceed one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(c) Aggregate Limitation. – The total amount of credits allowed pursuant to this section
may not exceed in the aggregate ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for all taxpayers for any one
calendar year.
(d) Application. – An eligible business claiming a credit under this section shall submit
an application for the credit to the Department for approval no later than December 15 of the
taxable year for which the credit is claimed. Applications shall be accepted on a first-come,
first-served basis. The Department shall create the application required under this section, which
shall require, at a minimum, proof of the applicant business's eligible expenses. The Department
shall review and approve applications submitted to it under this section by March 1 of the year
following the year in which the application was submitted. If the credit amounts for a taxable
year exceed the maximum aggregate limit of credits allowed under this section, the tax credits
must be allocated among the eligible businesses who filed a timely application on a first-come,
first-served basis upon the amounts otherwise allowed by this section.
(e) Report. – By June 30 of each year, the Department shall report (i) the number of
applications it received during the previous calendar year, (ii) the number of applications it
approved during the previous calendar year, and (iii) the total dollar amount of tax credits allowed
to eligible businesses during the previous calendar year to the Joint Legislative Committee on
Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division."
SECTION 3.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 4 House Bill 1142-First Edition